Utah statutes.
38-5-1.   Filing with clerk of district court --  Recording with county recorder -- Effect.

(1)  Transcripts of judgments or decrees rendered in the district court of the United States within the state may be filed in the office of the clerk of the state district court of any county in this state, and when so filed, such judgments or decrees shall have the same force and effect as a judgment rendered in a district court of this state in and for such county.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if a judgment or an abstract of judgment or decree under Subsection (1) is recorded in the office of the county recorder, that judgment or decree becomes a lien on the real property of the judgment debtor in that county owned or acquired during the time the judgment is effective.

(3)  State agencies are exempt from the recording requirement of Subsection (2).

